apertium-es-cs.cs.dix
    <!-- FIXME: not sure if the 'ý' should be 'i' instead -->
    <pardef n="Kowals/ki__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ki</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kého</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kému</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kého</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kim</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kim</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ki</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cí</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kých</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kým</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kých</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kými</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kých</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cí</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ka</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ké</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ké</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kou</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kou</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ké</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ka</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ké</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kých</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kým</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ké</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kými</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kých</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ké</l>
          <r>ki<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Verbs -->

    <pardef n="v_neg">
      <e><p><l/><r/></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ne</l><r>ne<s n="adv"/><j/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BASE__četl">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>o</l><r><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>i</l><r><s n="past"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r><s n="past"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p>          <l>y</l><r><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BASE__chtěn">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>o</l><r><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>i</l><r><s n="pp"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r><s n="pp"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="být"><par n="v_neg"/><i></i><par n="/být__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="mít"><par n="v_neg"/><i>m</i><par n="m/ít__vbhaver"/></e>
    <e lm="moci"><par n="v_neg"/><i>m</i><par n="m/oci__vaux"/></e>
    <e lm="třeba"><par n="v_neg"/><i>třeba</i><par n="třeba__vaux"/></e>
    <e lm="možna"><par n="v_neg"/><i>možna</i><par n="třeba__vaux"/></e>
    <e lm="číst"><par n="v_neg"/><i>č</i><par n="č/íst__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="přečíst"><par n="v_neg"/><i>přeč</i><par n="přeč/íst__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vědět"><par n="v_neg"/><i>v</i><par n="v/ědět__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="napsat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>naps</i><par n="naps/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="chtít"><par n="v_neg"/><i>ch</i><par n="ch/tít__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="doplnit"><par n="v_neg"/><i>dopl</i><par n="obr/nit__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="minout"><par n="v_neg"/><i>min</i><par n="min/out__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="milovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>mil</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="datovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>dat</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kastrovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>kastr</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kapitulovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>kapitul</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dezertovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>dezert</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="slibovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>slib</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pumpovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>pump</i><par n="mil/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="napumpovat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>napump</i><par n="napump/ovat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dávat"><par n="v_neg"/><i>dáv</i><par n="dáv/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="péci"><par n="v_neg"/><i>p</i><par n="p/éci__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vézt"><par n="v_neg"/><i>v</i><par n="v/ézt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hnát"><par n="v_neg"/><i></i><par n="/hnát__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hrát"><par n="v_neg"/><i>hr</i><par n="hr/át__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="žít"><par n="v_neg"/><i>ž</i><par n="ž/ít__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="krýt"><par n="v_neg"/><i>kr</i><par n="kr/ýt__vblex"/></e>
